test/src/morphology/V-iiqtistw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - ī’tistõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est ühtlustada/fin' - full paradigm
     ī’tistõ+V+Inf: ī’tistõ
     ī’tistõ+V+Ger: ī’tistõs
     ī’tistõ+V+Sup: ī’tistõm
     ī’tistõ+V+Sup+Ine: ī’tistõmõs
     ī’tistõ+V+Sup+Ela: ī’tistõmõst
     ī’tistõ+V+Sup+Tra: ī’tistõmõks
     ī’tistõ+V+Sup+Abe: ī’tistõmõt
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ī’tistõb
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ī’tistõt
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ī’tistõbõd
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ī’tistiz
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [ī’tistizt, ī’tistiztõ]
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [ī’tistizt, ī’tistiztõ]
     ī’tistõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: ī’tist
     ī’tistõ+V+Cond+Sg3: ī’tistõks
     ī’tistõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: ī’tist
     ī’tistõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ī’tist
     ī’tistõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: ī’tistõgid
     ī’tistõ+V+Jus+Sg3: ī’tistõg
     ī’tistõ+V+Quo+Sg3: ī’tistiji
     ī’tistõ+V+ActPrfPrc: ī’tistõn
     ī’tistõ+V+PssPrfPrc: ī’tistõd
